Nebraska, session 109, LB696.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
Section 1. Section 81-8,184, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
81-8,184 For purposes of the Professional Landscape Architects Act:
(1) Board means the State Board of Landscape Architects;
(2) Coordinating professional means a design professional who coordinates,
as appropriate, the work of all design professionals involved in a project;
(3) Design professional means a professional landscape architect, a
licensed architect, or a professional engineer;
(4) Direct supervision means having full professional knowledge and
control over work that constitutes the practice of landscape architecture in
accordance with the Professional Landscape Architects Act;
(5) (4) License means an authorization granted by the board to practice
landscape architecture;
(6) (5) Practice of landscape architecture means the application of the
principles of mathematical, physical, biological, and social sciences in
consultation, evaluation, planning, design, including, but not limited to, the
preparation, review and filing of plans, drawings, specifications, and other
contract documents, and administration of contracts relative to projects
principally directed at the functional and aesthetic use and preservation of
land in the performance of professional services. These professional services
include, but are not limited to:
(a) Investigation, selection, and allocation of land and natural resources
for appropriate uses;
(b) Development of feasibility and site selection studies to govern the
planning, design, and management of the land;
(c) Preparation, review, and analysis of land-use master, site, and
comprehensive development plans and preliminary subdivision plans;
(d) Determining the location and siting of improvements, including
buildings, site features, access, and environs for the improvements;
(e) Collaboration with architects, professional engineers, and
professional land surveyors in the design of streets, highways, bridges,
buildings, and structures with respect to the functional and aesthetic
requirements of the area in which such facilities are to be placed;
(f) Preservation and management of natural, cultural, historic, and
aesthetic resources;
(g) Design of: Sites, landforms, water features, and water bodies; site
grading; surface and subsurface drainage and management; sediment and erosion
control; noninhabitable structures; park and recreation areas; site vehicular
circulation systems, greenways, and streetscapes; equestrian, bicycle, and
pedestrian circulation systems; and site lighting, irrigation, plantings, and
related construction details and specifications; and
(h) Location and arrangement of such tangible objects and features as are
incidental and necessary to the purposes outlined in this section. Practice of
landscape architecture does not include the design of structures or facilities
with separate and self-contained purposes for habitation or industry, or the
design of streets and highways, utilities, storm and sanitary sewers, and water
and sewage treatment facilities, such as are exclusive to the practice of
engineering, architecture, or land surveying; and
(7) (6) Professional landscape architect or licensee means a person who is
licensed by the board to practice landscape architecture.
Sec. 2. Section 81-8,192, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
81-8,192 The board shall maintain and make available to the public a
complete roster of each professional landscape architect that includes the
showing his or her name and last-known address of each professional landscape
architect. The board may cause to be delivered a copy of such complete roster
to any person upon request. The board may charge a fee in accordance with
sections 84-712 to 84-712.09 to the requester of such a copy. The board shall
file the roster with the Secretary of State annually and may distribute a copy
to each professional landscape architect as well as county and municipal
officials.
Sec. 3. Section 81-8,196, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
-1-

LB696 LB696
2025 2025
81-8,196 (1) Applications for licensure as a professional landscape
architect shall be on forms prescribed and furnished by the State Board of
Landscape Architects.
(2) Applicants who hold a landscape architecture degree accredited by any
of the following Landscape Architectural Accreditation Board or its equivalent
as determined by the board may sit for the Landscape Architect Registration
Examination as administered by the Council of Landscape Architectural
Registration Boards: .
(a) The Landscape Architectural Accreditation Board or its equivalent as
determined by the State Board of Landscape Architects; or
(b) The Canadian Society of Landscape Architects or its equivalent as
determined by the State Board of Landscape Architects.
(3) The following shall be considered as the minimum evidence satisfactory
to the State Board of Landscape Architects that an applicant is eligible for
initial licensure, upon application, as a professional landscape architect:
(a) Submission of an application accompanied by the fee established by the
board, in accordance with subsection (1) of section 81-8,194;
(b) Submission of a council record maintained by the Council of Landscape
Architectural Registration Boards;
(b) (c) Graduation from a program accredited by any of the following:
(i) The Landscape Architectural Accreditation Board or its equivalent as
determined by the State Board of Landscape Architects; or
(ii) The Canadian Society of Landscape Architects or its equivalent as
determined by the State Board of Landscape Architects;
(c) (d) Passage of an examination on technical and professional subjects
as prescribed by the board or its equivalent as determined by the board; and
(d) (e) A record of three years or more of diversified post-degree
experience directly related to landscape architecture under the direct
supervision of a professional landscape architect in accordance with rules and
regulations adopted and promulgated by the board. or equivalent experience as
determined by the board; and
(f) One or more written professional references which shall be submitted
by the applicant to the board.
(4) Upon application, an An individual holding a license to practice
landscape architecture issued by a proper authority of any jurisdiction
recognized by the board, based on credentials that do not conflict with
subsection (3) of this section and other provisions of the Professional
Landscape Architects Act, may , upon application, be licensed as a professional
landscape architect after demonstration of good reputation and character.
(5) An individual who has been licensed to practice landscape architecture
for fifteen years or more in one or more jurisdictions recognized by the board
and who has practiced landscape architecture in compliance with the licensing
laws in the jurisdiction where his or her landscape architecture practice has
occurred since initial licensure may, upon application, be licensed as a
professional landscape architect after demonstration of good reputation and
character.
(5) (6) The board may accept the verified information contained in a valid
council record issued by the Council of Landscape Architectural Registration
Boards in lieu of the same information that is required on the form prescribed
by the board.
(6) Any examination material (7) Examination materials shall not be deemed
a considered public record subject to disclosure pursuant to sections 84-712 to
84-712.09 records.
(7) (8) The board may adopt the examinations and grading procedures of the
Council of Landscape Architectural Registration Boards. The board may also
adopt guidelines published from time to time by the council.
(8) (9) Licensure shall be effective upon issuance.
Sec. 4. Section 81-8,199, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
81-8,199 (1) The board shall issue to any applicant who has met the
requirements of the Professional Landscape Architects Act a certificate of
licensure giving the licensee proper authority to carry out the prerogatives of
the act. The certificate of licensure shall carry the designation Professional
Landscape Architect. The certificate of licensure shall give the full name of
the licensee and license number and shall be signed by two members of the
board.
(2) The certificate of licensure shall be prima facie evidence that the
person is entitled to all rights, privileges, and responsibilities of a
professional landscape architect while the certificate of licensure remains
unrevoked and unexpired.
(3) The board may issue a new certificate of licensure to replace any
lost, destroyed, or mutilated certificate of licensure or issue a duplicate of
any active certificate of licensure upon request from the licensee. A fee not
to exceed fifty dollars, in accordance with subsection (1) of section 81-8,194,
may be charged for each such issuance.
(4) Any person holding a certificate of licensure registration under the
Professional Landscape Architects Act as of the effective date of this act act
as of November 14, 2020, shall be deemed to be duly licensed under the
Professional Landscape Architects Act act until the expiration of such
certificate.
Sec. 5. Section 81-8,200, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
81-8,200 Certificates of licensure shall expire on a date established by
-2-

LB696 LB696
2025 2025
the board and shall become invalid on that date unless renewed. In 2021, a
licensee whose last name begins with a letter between the letters "A" and "L"
shall renew his or her certificate of licensure for one year and a licensee
whose last name begins with a letter between the letters "M" and "Z" shall
renew his or her certificate of licensure for two years. Each subsequent
renewal shall be for a two-year period. The board shall notify every person
licensed under the Professional Landscape Architects Act of the expiration date
of his or her certificate of licensure and the amount of the fee, in accordance
with subsection (1) of section 81-8,194, required for renewal. The notice shall
be sent at least one month in advance of the date of the expiration. Valid
certificates of licensure may be renewed prior to expiration upon application
and payment of applicable fees. The fee to be paid on an expired certificate of
licensure shall be increased by ten percent for each month or fraction of a
month such payment is delayed, except that the maximum fee for a delayed
renewal shall not exceed twice the amount of the original renewal fee and no
renewals shall be made after one year after the expiration date, in accordance
with subsection (1) of section 81-8,194. Expired licenses shall be renewed in
accordance with the rules and regulations of the board. The board may require
individual licensees to obtain professional development in accordance with the
rules and regulations of the board.
Sec. 6. Section 81-8,206, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
81-8,206 (1) The Professional Landscape Architects Act shall not apply to:
(a) Any employee of a professional landscape architect who performs
landscape architecture services under the direction and supervision of the
professional landscape architect. Such services do not include responsible
charge of design or the administration of construction contracts;
(b) Any employee who performs landscape architecture services for his or
her employer when all such services are completed for a facility owned or
operated by the employer and when such services are not offered to the public
and do not endanger the public health, safety, or welfare;
(c) The practice by a qualified member of another legally recognized
profession who is otherwise licensed or certified by this state to perform
services consistent with the laws of this state and the training and the code
of ethics of the respective profession if such qualified member does not
represent himself or herself to be a professional landscape architect; or
(d) Any person who seeks advice or help of any other person in planning,
planting, or maintaining the planting or conservation work on any property he
or she owns or controls or who does such things himself or herself.
(2) The Professional Landscape Architects Act shall not prohibit or
require compliance with the act for any person who engages in the professional
occupation of city, county, or city-county planning or a planning-related
occupation to undertake the activities described in subdivisions (6)(a) (5)(a)
through (f) of section 81-8,184, so long as such person does not use the title
of landscape architect or professional landscape architect.
(3) The Professional Landscape Architects Act does not prohibit any
person, officer, agent, or employee of any business entity with experience and
qualifications from engaging in the occupation of growing or marketing nursery
stock or to use the title landscape nurseryperson, landscape gardener,
landscape designer, landscape contractor, or land developer, so long as no
individual engages in the practice of landscape architecture or uses the title
landscape architect or professional landscape architect unless he or she is
licensed as such under the Professional Landscape Architects Act.
(4) The Professional Landscape Architects Act does not prevent a vendor of
goods, services, real estate, or materials, including nurserypersons, landscape
nurserypersons, gardeners, landscape gardeners, landscape designers, general
contractors registered under the Contractor Registration Act, landscape
contractors, land developers, golf course architects, or golf course designers
from providing drawings or graphic diagrams that are necessary for the proper
layout or development of the vendor's goods, services, real estate, or
materials for public or private land or arranging for the installation of the
goods or materials. The Professional Landscape Architects Act also does not
prevent a landscape designer or any person or firm registered under the
Contractor Registration Act from engaging in, for a fee, the design of spaces
utilizing plant materials and ancillary paving and building materials or
arranging for or engaging in the installation of the materials.
Sec. 7. Section 81-8,208, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
81-8,208 (1) The board, after hearing and upon proof satisfactory to the
board, may determine by a two-thirds majority vote that any person has violated
the Professional Landscape Architects Act or any rule or regulation under the
act.
(2) Upon a finding that a person has committed a violation, one or more of
the following actions may be taken against such person upon a two-thirds
majority vote of the board:
(a) Issuance of a censure or reprimand;
(b) Suspension of judgment;
(c) Placement of the offender on probation;
(d) Placement of a limitation or limitations on a licensee and upon the
privilege of a licensee to engage in the practice of landscape architecture to
the extent, scope, or type of landscape architecture practice for such time and
under such conditions as are found necessary and proper;
(e) Imposition of a civil penalty not to exceed ten thousand dollars for
-3-

LB696 LB696
2025 2025
each offense. The amount of the penalty shall be based on the severity of the
violation;
(f) Entrance of an order of revocation or , suspension , or cancellation
of the certificate of licensure;
(g) Issuance of a cease and desist order;
(h) Imposition of costs as in an ordinary civil action in the district
court, which may include reasonable attorney's fees and hearing officer fees
incurred by the board and the expenses of any investigation undertaken by the
board; or
(i) Dismissal of the action.
(3) The board may take into account suitable evidence of reform when
determining appropriate action.
(4) Civil penalties collected under subdivision (2)(e) of this section
shall be remitted to the State Treasurer for distribution in accordance with
Article VII, section 5, of the Constitution of Nebraska. All costs collected
under subdivision (2)(h) of this section shall be remitted to the State
Treasurer for credit to the State Board of Landscape Architects Cash Fund.
Sec. 8. Original sections 81-8,184, 81-8,192, 81-8,196, 81-8,199,
81-8,200, 81-8,206, and 81-8,208, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, are
repealed.
-4-